Hawaii statutes.
§134-34 National emergency, when. A
national emergency or crisis shall be deemed to have arisen when the governor
and the senior United States military commander headquartered in the State or,
in the absence of the commander, a duly designated representative have, in the
exercise of their discretion, so determined. [L 1921, c 13, pt of §1; RL 1925,
§2035; RL 1935, §2556; RL 1945, §7197; RL 1955, §157-32; HRS §134-34; am L
1989, c 215, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next